Hawaii statutes.
§707-722 Unlawful imprisonment in the
second degree. (1) A person commits the offense of unlawful imprisonment
in the second degree if the person knowingly restrains another person.

(2) In any prosecution under this section, it
is an affirmative defense that:

(a) The person restrained was less than eighteen
years old;

(b) The defendant was a relative of the victim; and

(c) The defendant's sole purpose was to assume
custody over the victim.

In that case, the liability of the defendant, if
any, is governed by section 707-727, and the defendant may be convicted under
section 707-727, although charged under this section.

(3) In any prosecution under this section, it
is an affirmative defense that:

(a) The
person restrained was:

(i) On or in the immediate vicinity of the
premises of a retail mercantile establishment for the purpose of investigation
or questioning as to the ownership of any merchandise;

(ii) Restrained in a reasonable manner and for
not more than a reasonable time; and

(iii) Restrained to permit the investigation or
questioning by a police officer or by the owner of the retail mercantile
establishment, the owner's authorized employee, or the owner's agent; and

(b) The police officer, owner, employee, or agent
had reasonable grounds to believe that the person detained was committing or
attempting to commit theft of merchandise on the premises.

(4) Unlawful imprisonment in the second degree
is a misdemeanor. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1981, c 171, §2; gen ch 1993; am
L 2015, c 35, §24]

Case Notes

A specific unanimity jury instruction was not required for
offense of second degree unlawful imprisonment under this section where
defendant's conduct, as proved by the prosecution, constituted a continuing
course of conduct "set on foot by a single impulse and operated by an
unintermittent force", with "one general intent ... and one
continuous plan". 95 H. 440, 24 P.3d 32 (2001).

COMMENTARY ON §§707-720 TO 707-722

These three offenses are gradations based upon the underlying
conduct of interference with a person's liberty. The gradations are based upon
the seriousness of the circumstances or purpose attending this interference.
The interference with liberty is dealt with under the general definition of "restrain."[1]

Where the restraint is for the purpose of personal gain, or
for certain purposes which are themselves unlawful, the offense is termed "kidnapping,"
and the most severe sanctions apply.[2] The statutory provision for
mitigation, in cases where the victim is released unharmed, is intended (1) to
differentiate according to the severity of the actual harm involved, and (2) to
encourage the actor to proceed less dangerously once the criminal course of
conduct has begun.[3]

Previous Hawaii law defined kidnapping as the forceful,
fraudulent, or deceitful imprisonment, seizing, detention, or inveiglement of
any person.[4] The difficulty in dealing with such words is immediately
apparent. Moreover, the mandatory term of life imprisonment is thought
somewhat too harsh to be imposed as a rule. Instances of kidnapping which are
so heinous as to call for a sanction commensurate with that for murder will
almost necessarily fall under the provisions for extended sentences, whereby
the normal sentence for a class A felony may be extended to life
imprisonment.[5] The Code's sentence is commensurate with that of the Model
Penal Code and with most recent state revisions.[6]

Where the restraint poses a danger of serious injury, or
where it involves involuntary servitude, the offense, defined in §707-721, is "unlawful
imprisonment in the first degree." This offense is a class C felony,
commensurate with 18 U.S.C. §§1581 et seq., which, enacted pursuant to the
Thirteenth Amendment, makes it a felony to hold or return a person "to a
condition of peonage," or to kidnap, carry away, or hold a person to be "sold
into involuntary servitude, or held as a slave."

Unlawful imprisonment in the second degree consists of any
knowing restraint of another person. The offense is graded as a misdemeanor,
and is commensurate with the common-law offense of false imprisonment: it is
also the substantial equivalent of "unlawful imprisonment" under
previous Hawaii law.[7] The lawful exercise of custodial powers over a minor
is, of course, excluded from the operation of this section.

It must be noted that, in all the above offenses involving
interference with personal liberty, the duration of restraint necessary for
conviction depends upon the intent and attendant circumstances. In this
regard, something like a reasonable standard applies. Hence, a short restraint
in an area where the victim might suffocate or come to other bodily harm would
constitute a substantial interference with liberty under these sections.
However, a short restraint in a store, based on a reasonable suspicion of
shoplifting, would not amount to a substantial interference with liberty for
the purposes of these offenses.[8]

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §§707-720 TO 707-722

When the legislature adopted the Code in 1972, it added the
affirmative defense now set forth in §707-722(3). It is an attempt to assure
that reasonable restraint is allowed for the purpose of apprehending persons
suspected of "shoplifting."

The Conference Committee Report of the legislature stated:

It is the intent of your Committee
that "reasonable grounds" includes, but is not limited to, knowledge
that a person has concealed possession of unpurchased merchandise of the retail
mercantile establishment; that "reasonable time" means the time
necessary to permit the person detained to make a statement or to refuse to
make a statement, and the time necessary to examine employees, and records of
the mercantile establishment relative to the ownership of the merchandise; and
that "retail mercantile establishment" means a place where goods,
wares, or merchandise are offered to the public for sale. Conference Committee
Report No. 2 (1972).

Act 147, Session Laws 2008, amended §707-720(1) by making it
a crime of kidnapping to intentionally or knowingly restrain another person
with the intent to unlawfully obtain the labor or services of the person,
regardless of whether a debt collection is involved. The legislature
strengthened the laws on prostitution and related offenses to deter and punish
sexual exploitation of minors, including obscenity-related activities.
Conference Committee Report No. 38-08.

Act 147, Session Laws 2008, amended §707-721(1) by deleting a
reference to involuntary servitude. Conference Committee Report No. 38-08.

Act 35, Session Laws 2015, amended §707-722(2) and (3) by
making technical nonsubstantive amendments.

__________

§§707-720 to 707-722 Commentary:

1. §707-700(5).

2. §707-720.

3. §707-720(3).

4. H.R.S. §749-1.

5. Cf. §§706-661, 662.

6. M.P.C. §212.1; see N.Y.R.P.L. §135.35; Prop. Del. Cr. Code
§452; Prop. Mich. Rev. Cr. Code §2210; and Prop. Pa. Cr. Code §1101.

7. H.R.S. §749-2.

8. Cf. §707-700(5).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next